New Mexico, session 2026, HB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 66-1-4.5 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1990, Chapter 120, Section 6, as amended) is amended to read: "66-1-4.5. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Motor Vehicle Code: A. "electric-assisted bicycle" means a vehicle having two or three wheels, fully operable pedals and an electric motor. Electric-assisted bicycles are classified as follows: (1) "class 1 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle equipped with a motor not exceeding seven hundred fifty watts of power that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches a speed of twenty miles per hour; (2) "class 2 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle equipped with a motor not exceeding seven hundred fifty watts of power that provides assistance regardless of whether the rider is pedaling but ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches a speed of twenty miles per hour; and (3) "class 3 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle equipped with a motor not exceeding seven hundred fifty watts of power that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches a speed of twenty-eight miles per hour; B. "electric mobility device" means a two- or three-wheel vehicle with an electric motor for propulsion that does not meet the definition of an electric-assisted bicycle and is capable of exceeding a speed of twenty miles per hour on motor power alone; C. "electric vehicle" means a motor vehicle that derives all of the vehicle's power from electricity stored in a battery that: (a) has a capacity of not less than twenty-five kilowatt-hours; (b) is capable of powering the vehicle for a range of at least one hundred miles; and (c) is capable of being recharged from an external source of electricity; [C.] D. "electric personal assistive mobility device" means a self-balancing device having two nontandem wheels designed to transport a single person by means of an electric propulsion system with an average power of one horsepower and with a maximum speed on a paved level surface of less than twenty miles per hour when powered solely by its propulsion system and while being ridden by an operator who weighs one hundred seventy pounds; [D.] E. "electronic credential" means an electronic extension of the department-issued physical credential that conveys identity and driving privilege information; [E.] F. "electronic credential system" means a digital process that includes a method for loading electronic credentials onto a device, issuing electronic credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential data elements and performing tasks to maintain the system; [F.] G. "essential parts" means all integral and body parts of a vehicle of a type required to be registered by the provisions of the Motor Vehicle Code, the removal, alteration or substitution of which would tend to conceal the identity of the vehicle or substantially alter its appearance, model, type or mode of operation; [G.] H. "established place of business", for a dealer or auto recycler, means a place: (1) devoted exclusively to the business for which the dealer or auto recycler is licensed and related business; (2) identified by a prominently displayed sign giving the dealer's or auto recycler's trade name used by the business; (3) of sufficient size or space to permit the display of one or more vehicles or to permit the parking or storing of vehicles to be dismantled or wrecked for recycling; (4) on which there is located an enclosed building on a permanent foundation, which building meets the building requirements of the community and is large enough to accommodate the office or offices of the dealer or auto recycler and large enough to provide a safe place to keep the books and records of the dealer or auto recycler; (5) where the principal portion of the business of the dealer or auto recycler is conducted and where the books and records of the business are kept and maintained; and (6) where vehicle sales are of new vehicles only, such as a department store or a franchisee of a department store, as long as the department store or franchisee keeps the books and records of its vehicle business in a general office location at its place of business; as used in this paragraph, "department store" means a business that offers a variety of merchandise other than vehicles, and sales of the merchandise other than vehicles constitute at least eighty percent of the gross sales of the business; and [H.] I. "explosives" means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture that is commonly used or intended for the purpose of producing an explosion and that contains any oxidizing and combustive units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities or packing that an ignition by fire, friction, concussion, percussion or detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects or of destroying life or limb." SECTION 2. Section 66-7-410 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 481, as amended) is amended to read: "66-7-410. GROSS WEIGHT OF VEHICLES AND LOADS.-- A. Subject to the limit upon the weight imposed upon the highway through any one axle as set forth in Section 66-7-409 NMSA 1978 and except as provided in Subsection D of this section, the total gross weight with load imposed upon the highway by any one group of two or more consecutive axles of a vehicle or combination of vehicles shall not exceed the gross weight given for the respective distance between the first and last axle of the group of axles measured longitudinally to the nearest foot as set forth in the following table: Distance in feet between first  Allowed load in pounds and last axles of group         on group of axles 4                          34,320 5                          35,100 6                          35,880 7                          36,660 8                          37,440 9                          38,220 10                         39,000 11                         39,780 12                         40,560 13                         41,340 14                         42,120 15                         42,900 16                         43,680 17                         44,460 18                         45,240. B. Except as provided in Subsection D of this section, the total gross weight with load imposed on the highway by any vehicle or combination of vehicles where the distance between the first and last axles is more than eighteen feet shall not exceed that given for the respective distances in the following table: Distance in feet between first  Allowed load in pounds and last axles of group         on group of axles 19                         53,100 20                         54,000 21                         54,900 22                         55,800 23                         56,700 24                         57,600 25                         58,500 26                         59,400 27                         60,300 28                         61,200 29                         62,100 30                         63,000 31                         63,900 32                         64,800 33                         65,700 34                         66,600 35                         67,500 36                         68,400 37                         69,300 38                         70,200 39                         71,100 40                         72,000 41                         72,900 42                         73,800 43                         74,700 44                         75,600 45                         76,500 46                         77,400 47                         78,300 48                         79,200 49                         80,100 50                         81,000 51                         81,900 52                         82,800 53                         83,700 54                         84,600 55                         85,500 56 or over                 86,400. C. The distance between the centers of the axles shall be measured to the nearest even foot. When a fraction is exactly one-half, the next larger whole number shall be used. D. The total gross weight with load limitations imposed by this section for any vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be increased by: (1) four hundred pounds if the vehicle or combination of vehicles uses idle reduction technology; [or] (2) if the vehicle is a natural gas vehicle, a standard gross weight limit increase for each axle distance category in this section, established by the division by rule, by an amount equal to the difference between the average weight of the vehicle attributable to its natural gas tank and fuel system and the average weight of a comparable diesel tank and fuel system; or (3) if the vehicle is an electric vehicle, a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds or more." - 9 -